Hawaii statutes.
§371-20 National Human Trafficking Resource
Center hotline; posting requirement; penalty. (a) Every employer
specified in subsection (b) shall post and keep posted in a place readily
accessible to individuals in the employer's employ a poster no smaller than
eight and one-half inches by eleven inches in size that states the following:

"If you or someone you
know is being forced to engage in any activity and cannot leave – whether it is
commercial sex, housework, farm work, or any other similar activity – call the
National Human Trafficking Resource Center Hotline at 1-888-373-7888 to access
help and services.

Victims of human
trafficking are protected under United States and Hawaii law.

The hotline is:

(1) Available twenty-four hours a day, seven days a
week;

(2) Toll-free;

(3) Operated by a nonprofit, nongovernmental
organization;

(4) Anonymous and confidential;

(5) Accessible in one hundred seventy languages; and

(6) Able to provide help, referral to services,
training, and general information."

(b) For purposes of this section,
"employer" means any person that:

(1) Holds a class 5 or class 11 liquor license
pursuant to section 281-31;

(2) Maintains a massage therapy establishment that employs
five or more people; or

(3) Employs one or more erotic or nude massagers or exotic
or nude dancers as defined in section 712-1210.

(c) A poster
required under subsection (a) shall be printed in English and the director may
supplement the required information.

(d) The department shall make available on its
public website an electronic version of the poster required by subsection (a)
for employers to print.

(e) Any employer who wilfully and knowingly
fails, neglects, or refuses to perform any act required by this section shall
be fined not more than $100 for each separate offense. Each day the violation
continues shall constitute a separate offense. Any action taken to impose or
collect the penalty provided for in this subsection shall be considered a civil
action. [L 2013, c 245, §1; am L 2015, c 35, §11]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next